Illinois, session 104th, HB3295.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Day and Temporary Labor Services Act is 5amended by changing Section 40 as follows: 6    (820 ILCS 175/40)7    Sec. 40. Work Restriction. No day and temporary labor 8service agency shall restrict the right of a day or temporary 9laborer to accept a permanent position with a third party 10client to whom the day or temporary laborer has been referred 11for work or restrict the right of such third party client to 12offer such employment to a day or temporary laborer. A day and 13temporary labor service agency may charge a placement fee to a 14third party client for employing a day or temporary laborer 15for whom a contract for work was effected by the day and 16temporary labor service agency (i) as agreed upon in advance 17by the day and temporary labor service agency and the third 18party client, or (ii) otherwise not to exceed the equivalent 19of the total daily commission rate the day and temporary labor 20service agency would have received over a 60-day period from 21the third party client, reduced by the equivalent of the daily 22commission rate the day and temporary labor service agency 23actually would have received for each day the day or temporary   HB3295- 2 -LRB104 09955 SPS 20025 b1laborer has performed work for the third party client the day 2and temporary labor service agency in the preceding 12 months. 3Days worked for any particular third party client at a day and 4temporary labor service agency in the 12 months preceding 5January 1, 2006 (the effective date of Public Act 94-511) this 6amendatory Act of the 94th General Assembly shall be included 7for purposes of calculating the maximum placement fee 8described in this Section. However, placement of a day or 9temporary laborer who is contracted by a day and temporary 10labor service agency to provide skilled labor shall not be 11subject to any placement fee cap. For purposes of this 12Section, a day or temporary laborer who performs "skilled 13labor" shall apply only where the day and temporary labor 14service agency performs an advanced application process, a 15screening process, which may include processes such as 16advanced testing, and a job interview. No fee provided for 17under this Section may be assessed or collected by the day and 18temporary labor service agency when the day or temporary 19laborer is offered permanent work following the suspension or 20revocation of the day and temporary labor service agency's 21registration by the Department.22(Source: P.A. 94-511, eff. 1-1-06.)